District of Columbia statutes.
29-1204.03

Duties of trustee in series trust.

If there is at least one trustee of a series trust that, in discharging its duties, is obligated to consider the interests of the trust and all series thereof, the governing instrument may provide that one or more other trustees, in discharging their duties, may consider only the interests of the trust or one or more series thereof.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 403 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.
This section is referenced in § 29-1201.03, § 29-1201.04, § 29-1204.01, and § 29-1205.05.